Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 6. Financing of Other Projects

History.

2019 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 6(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-601.
Applicability.

The definitions in W.S.

37-5-501

shall apply to this article.

History.

2019 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 6(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-602.
Authority revenue bonds; issuance; amount.

Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 49, § 2.

The authority may issue and have outstanding bonds to finance energy transmission facilities and related infrastructure, pipeline and other transportation and distribution projects consistent with the purposes of W.S. 37-5-503(a), which may be located within or without the state of Wyoming, in an amount not to exceed three billion dollars ($3,000,000,000.00). The financing of a pipeline or other transportation and distribution projects under this article may include or consist solely of the purchase of capacity by the authority as authorized by subsection (m) of this section.

The principal amount of any bonds that have been retired, redeemed, defeased or refunded by the authority need not be taken into account in computing compliance with the maximum amounts of bonds authorized to be issued under subsections (b) and (n) of this section.

Subject to subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the authority may issue bonds in principal amounts the authority determines necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving its purposes under this article, including the reduction of principal, the payment of interest, the establishment of reserves, the costs of administration and for the purpose of defraying all other associated costs. All bonds issued under this article are negotiable instruments under the laws of this state unless expressly provided to the contrary on the face of the bonds. The authority may enter into contracts to insure the payment of principal and interest, for interest rate exchange contracts and for financial guarantees to lower the cost of its borrowing.

All bonds issued by the authority are payable solely out of special funds consisting of all or part of its revenues, receipts, monies and assets, as designated in the proceedings under which the bonds are authorized. All bonds shall bear interest at fixed or variable rates, be executed and delivered at times and in denominations, be of terms and maturities, be in registered form as to principal and interest or principal alone, and bear manual or facsimile signatures and seals as the authority determines. Bonds issued by the authority are not general obligations of this state nor of any political subdivision of this state. The bonds shall solely be the obligation of the authority and shall recite on their face that they do not constitute obligations of the state or any political subdivisions of the state.

Bonds may be payable in installments and may bear maturities not exceeding forty (40) years from the date issued as the authority determines.

Bonds and interest may be payable at a time or place whether within or outside the state, as the authority determines. Bonds may contain other provisions not inconsistent with this article.

Any bonds that the authority issues may contain an option to redeem all or any part as may be specified. The price of redemption, the terms and conditions and the procedure of notice shall be set forth by the authority and may appear on the face of the bonds.

Any bonds of the authority may be sold at, above or below par value, at public or private sale, in a manner and from time to time as determined by the authority. The authority may pay legal fees, expenses, premiums and commissions that it finds necessary or advantageous to this state in connection with the issuance and sale.

The authority may provide for the issuance of bonds to refund any bonds of the authority then outstanding, including for the payment of any redemption premium and any interest or premium accrued or to accrue to, the earliest or subsequent date of redemption, purchase or maturity of the bonds. The authority may also refund bonds issued by the Wyoming pipeline authority under W.S.

37-5-201

through

37-5-208

and the Wyoming infrastructure authority under W.S.

37-5-401

through

37-5-408

before July 1, 2020. Refunding shall be accomplished in the manner prescribed by W.S.

16-5-101

through

16-5-119

to the extent it is not inconsistent with this article.

The authority may acquire, purchase, make prepayments for, finance, hold, use, lease, license, sell, transfer and dispose of an undivided or other interest in or the right to capacity in any pipeline or other transportation or distribution system within or without the state of Wyoming. The authority may acquire, purchase, make prepayments for proven developed reserves, hold, use, lease, license, sell, transfer and dispose of an undivided or other interest in natural resources associated with energy, including royalties taken in kind. The powers specified in this subsection may be exercised in order to facilitate the production, transportation, distribution or delivery of associated natural resources produced or developed in this state. The authority is exempt from the provisions of W.S. 37-5-503(g) when exercising the powers granted by this article.

Subject to subsection (b) of this section and consistent with the purposes of W.S. 37-5-503(a), the authority may issue and have outstanding bonds to finance facilities, infrastructure and other transportation and distribution projects related to the production, transportation, distribution and utilization of rare earth minerals, critical materials, trona and other minerals that are located in Wyoming.

History.

2019 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 49, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 6(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, repealed (a), as created by Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 2, which read “The authority may issue and have outstanding bonds to finance energy transmission facilities and related infrastructure consistent with the purposes of W.S. 37-5-503(a), in an amount not to exceed one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000.00). The authority shall have contracts sufficient to justify the issuance of bonds”; and in (b) added “energy transmission facilities and related infrastructure” following “bonds to finance” and “consistent with the purposes of W.S. 37-5-503(a)” following “distribution projects.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in (c), deleted "(a) and" following "under subsections," and added "and (n)" preceding "of this section"; and added (n).

§ 37-5-603.
Authority revenue bonds; security; payments after retirement.

The principal and interest on any bonds that the authority issues shall be secured by a pledge of revenues from the operation of the pipeline or other transportation or distribution system or energy transmission project financed, by a first mortgage on the facilities, by guarantees and pledges of the entity owning the project, pipeline or system, or of the parent corporation owning said entity or by any combination thereof or other security as the authority may determine to be reasonable and prudent. The guarantees and pledges shall be no less favorable to the authority than those granted other lenders of the same class.

The authority may require additional payments, as negotiated, to bondholders to be made either in a lump sum at the time of retirement of the bonds or annually from the time of retirement of the bonds until project, pipeline or system use is terminated or may require additional incentives from the owner of the project or pipeline to prospective bondholders so long as the incentives are not contrary to the Wyoming constitution.

The authority may require such other security for repayment of the bonds as it deems necessary.

Each pledge, agreement, mortgage or other instrument made for the benefit or security of any bonds of the authority is valid and binding from the time when made. The revenues, receipts, monies and assets pledged are immediately subject to the lien of the pledge without delivery or further act. The lien is valid and binding against persons having claims of any kind against the authority whether or not the persons have actual notice of the lien. The resolution or the indenture or other instrument by which a pledge is created need not be recorded or filed.

History.

2019 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 6(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-604.
Exemptions from taxation.

The exercise of the powers granted by this article constitutes the performance of an essential governmental function. Any bonds issued under this article and the income therefrom shall be free from taxation of every kind by the state, municipalities and political subdivisions of the state.

History.

2019 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 6(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-605.
Bonds as legal investments.

The bonds of the authority are legal investments that may be used as collateral for public funds of the state, insurance companies, banks, savings and loan associations, investment companies, trustees and other fiduciaries that may properly and legally invest funds in their control or belonging to them in bonds of the authority. With the written approval of the state loan and investment board and the attorney general, the state treasurer may invest monies from the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund in bonds of the authority in an amount specified by the state loan and investment board and the attorney general but not to exceed the amount specified in W.S. 37-5-602(a) and (b). The interest payable on the bonds shall be not less than four percent (4%), and revenue under W.S. 37-5-602(b) shall be credited as received to the general fund. The limitation on specific public purpose investments under W.S. 9-4-715(n) shall not apply to investments made under this section.

History.

2019 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 6(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-606.
State pledge not to impair bondholder’s rights and remedies.

The state pledges to the holders of any bonds issued under this article that the state will not limit or alter the rights vested in the authority to fulfill the terms of agreements made with the holders, or in any way impair the rights and remedies of the holders until the bonds together with the interest, with interest on any unpaid installments of interest and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceeding by or on behalf of the holders are fully met and discharged. The authority is authorized to include this pledge of the state in any agreement with the holders of the bonds.

History.

2019 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 6(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-607.
Powers; duties; limitations.

The authority has the powers granted by W.S.

37-5-501

through

37-5-509

as necessary to carry out the purposes of this article, including the power to hire technical consultants, financial advisors and legal advisors and specifically including the powers granted by W.S. 37-5-504(a)(ii). In addition to the powers otherwise granted to the authority, the authority shall have the power to:

Enter into loan or other agreements with respect to one (1) or more projects, energy transmission infrastructure, energy export facilities, pipelines or systems upon terms and conditions the authority considers advisable;

Make and execute agreements, contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of its powers and functions, including contracts with any individual, firm, corporation, governmental agency or other entity.

The authority may assess and collect fees that are nonrefundable from applicants seeking to obtain authority financing of an energy transmission infrastructure project, energy export facility, pipeline, system or other project in total amounts not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00), which shall be credited to the state general fund.

The authority shall maintain such records and accounts of revenues and expenditures as required by the director of the state department of audit. The director of the state department of audit or his designee shall conduct an annual financial and legal compliance audit of the accounts of the authority and file copies of the audit with the governor and the legislature.

The authority shall require that any project owner receiving a loan under this article shall maintain records and accounts relating to the receipt and disbursements of loan proceeds, transportation costs and information on energy and associated natural resource sales and deliveries and make the records available to the state auditor for inspection.

The sole recourse of any party contracting with the authority shall be against the authority, and there shall be no cause of action against the state, or any county, municipality or other political subdivision of the state.

History.

2019 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 6(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2020.